Alabama, session 2026rs, HB286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
HB286 INTRODUCED
Section 1. Sections 40-21-83 and 40-21-103, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§40-21-83
There are specifically excluded from the gross receipts
or gross sales of a utility, all revenues derived from any of
the following:
(1) The furnishing of utility services which the State
of Alabama is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or
laws of the United States of America or the Constitution of
the State of Alabama of 2022.
(2) The furnishing of utility services which are
otherwise taxed under Sections 40-23-1 to 40-23-36, inclusive.
(3) Wholesale sales.
(4) The furnishing of electricity, natural gas, or
domestic water for use or consumption by, in, or for the
direct production, generation, processing, storage, delivery,
or transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water.
(5) The furnishing of electricity to a manufacturer or
compounder for use in an electrolytic or electrothermal
manufacturing or compounding process.
(6) The furnishing of natural gas to a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy.
(7) The furnishing of natural gas to be used by a
manufacturer or compounder to chemically convert raw materials
prior to the use of the converted raw materials in an
Page 2

prior to the use of the converted raw materials in an
HB286 INTRODUCED
electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing or compounding
process.
(8) The use or consumption of electricity by an
incorporated municipality, a board, or corporation organized
under the authority of any incorporated municipality in
furnishing or providing street lighting or traffic-control
systems; the use or consumption of telephone services by an
incorporated municipality in providing fire alarm systems; and
the use or consumption of domestic water by an incorporated
municipality in extinguishing fires, explosions, or
conflagrations.
(9) The furnishing of natural gas or electricity for
use or consumption as fuel or energy in and for the heating of
poultry houses.
(10) The furnishing of utility services through the use
of a prepaid telephone calling card.
(11)(a) The furnishing of natural gas, electricity, or
telephone services or other connective services for use or
consumption by or in radio and television broadcast stations
licensed by the Federal Communications Commission.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "telephone
services or other connective services" means telephone
services or other voice or data interconnectivity services of
any type, including, but not limited to, the following:
1. Transmitters, transmission lines, antennas, and
monitoring and other equipment, which amplifies, modifies, and
transmits or otherwise controls broadcast signals.
2. Studio equipment and studio facilities for
Page 3

2. Studio equipment and studio facilities for
HB286 INTRODUCED
preparation and production of programming and other content
and for distributing such programming and content.
3. Computers, power supplies, generators, and any other
standby power supplies, attenuators, and converters."
"§40-21-103
The storage, use, or other consumption of utility
services in the State of Alabama is hereby specifically
excluded from the tax herein levied:
(1) Whenever the State of Alabama is prohibited from
taxing such storage, use, or consumption under the
Constitution or laws of the United States of America or the
Constitution of the State of Alabama of 2022;
(2) Whenever any tax relating to the sale, use,
storage, or consumption of said utility services shall be
levied under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 23 of this
100 title, or under the provisions of Sections 40-23-1 through
101 40-23-36 or the Alabama Transaction Tax Act of 1992 if enacted
102 into law;
103 (3) Whenever the purchase of said utility services
104 shall have been at a wholesale sale;
105 (4) Whenever electricity, natural gas, or domestic
106 water shall have been used or consumed directly in or for the
107 production, generation, processing, storage, delivery, or
108 transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic water;
109 (5) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
110 other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
111 compounder in an electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing
112 or compounding process;
Page 4

or compounding process;
HB286 INTRODUCED
113 (6) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
114 other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
115 compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
116 compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
117 energy;
118 (7) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
119 other consumption is used by a manufacturer or compounder to
120 chemically convert raw materials prior to the use of such
121 converted raw materials in an electrolytic or electrothermal
122 manufacturing or compounding process;
123 (8) Whenever the sales price of said utility services
124 shall be included as a part of the gross receipts or gross
125 sales of a utility subject to the utility gross receipts tax
126 for the purpose of calculating the utility gross receipts tax
127 payable by said utility;
128 (9) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
129 other consumption is used or consumed in a process for the
130 isotopic enrichment of uranium and when said electricity is
131 purchased from a subsidiary corporation of the corporation
132 engaged in the isotopic enrichment of uranium; and
133 (10) Whenever utility services are furnished through
134 the use of a prepaid telephone calling card; and
135 (11) (a) Whenever natural gas, electricity, or
136 telephone services or other connective services are purchased
137 for use or consumption by or in radio and television broadcast
138 stations licensed by the Federal Communications Commission.
139 (b) For the purposes of this section, "telephone
140 services or other connective services" means telephone
Page 5

services or other connective services" means telephone
HB286 INTRODUCED
141 services or other voice or data interconnectivity services of
142 any type, including, but not limited to, the following:
143 1. Transmitters, transmission lines, antennas, and
144 monitoring and other equipment, which amplifies, modifies, and
145 transmits or otherwise controls broadcast signals.
146 2. Studio equipment and studio facilities for
147 preparation and production of programming and other content
148 and for distributing such programming and content.
149 3. Computers, power supplies, generators, and any other
150 standby power supplies, attenuators, and converters."
151 Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
152 1, 2026.
Page 6